test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-iiqdwksmwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Numeral - īʼdõksmõz: # quantifiers 165 'eng /est üheksas/fin' - full paradigm
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: [īʼdõksmõz, īdõksmõz]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen: [īʼdõksmõnd, īdõksmõnd]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Par: [īʼdõksmõndt, īdõksmõndt]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Dat: [īʼdõksmõndõn, īdõksmõndõn]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ins: [īʼdõksmõndõks, īdõksmõndõks]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill: [īʼdõksmõndõ, īdõksmõndõ]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela: [īʼdõksmõndõst, īdõksmõndõst]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom: [īʼdõksmõndõd, īdõksmõndõd]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen: [īʼdõksmõndõd, īdõksmõndõd]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Par: [īʼdõksmõndidi, īdõksmõndidi]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Dat: [īʼdõksmõndõdõn, īdõksmõndõdõn]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ins: [īʼdõksmõndõdõks, īdõksmõndõdõks]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill: [īʼdõksmõndiž, īdõksmõndiž]
     īʼdõksmõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela: [īʼdõksmõndist, īdõksmõndist]
